Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.02, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Motorized bicycle. (a) A motorized bicycle may not be operated on any public roadway by any person who does not possess a valid driver's license, unless the person has obtained a motorized bicycle operator's permit or motorized bicycle instruction permit from the commissioner of public safety. The operator's permit may be issued to any person who has attained the age of 15 years and who has passed the examination prescribed by the commissioner. The instruction permit may be issued to any person who has attained the age of 15 years and who has successfully completed an approved safety course and passed the written portion of the examination prescribed by the commissioner. (b) This course must consist of, but is not limited to, a basic understanding of: (1) motorized bicycles and their limitations; (2) motorized bicycle laws and rules; (3) safe operating practices and basic operating techniques; (4) helmets and protective clothing; (5) motorized bicycle traffic strategies; and (6) effects of alcohol and drugs on motorized bicycle operators. (c) The commissioner may adopt rules prescribing the content of the safety course, examination, and the information to be contained on the permits. A person operating a motorized bicycle under a motorized bicycle permit is subject to the restrictions imposed by section 169.974, subdivision 2, on operation of a motorcycle under a two-wheel instruction permit. (d) The fees for motorized bicycle operator's permits are as follows: (1) Motorized bicycle operator's permit before age 21 and valid until age 21 $ 9.75 (2) Renewal permit age 21 or older and valid for deleted text begin fourdeleted text end new text begin eightnew text end years $ deleted text begin 15.75deleted text end new text begin 31.50new text end (3) Duplicate of any renewal permit $ 5.25 (4) Written examination and instruction permit, valid for 30 days $ 6.75 new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to new or renewal applications for drivers' licenses or identification cards submitted on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.06, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Fees. (a) The fees for a license and Minnesota identification card are as follows: REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant Classified Driver's License deleted text begin D-$27.75 deleted text end new text begin D-$55.50 new text end C-$31.75 B-$38.75 A-$46.75 REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant Classified Under-21 D.L. D-$27.75 C-$31.75 B-$38.75 A-$26.75 Enhanced Driver's License deleted text begin D-$42.75 deleted text end new text begin D-$85.50 new text end C-$46.75 B-$53.75 A-$61.75 REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant Instruction Permit $11.25 Enhanced Instruction Permit $26.25 Commercial Learner's Permit $8.50 REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant Provisional License $14.25 Enhanced Provisional License $29.25 Duplicate REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant License or duplicate REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant identification card $12.75 deleted text begin Enhanceddeleted text end Duplicate new text begin Enhanced new text end License or deleted text begin enhanceddeleted text end duplicate new text begin enhanced new text end identification card $27.75 new text begin REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant identification card, except as otherwise provided in section 171.07, subdivisions 3 and 3a new text end new text begin $34.50 new text end deleted text begin REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant Minnesota identification card ordeleted text end REAL ID Compliant or Noncompliant Under-21 deleted text begin Minnesotadeleted text end identification card, deleted text begin other than duplicate,deleted text end except as otherwise provided in section 171.07, deleted text begin subdivisionsdeleted text end new text begin subdivisionnew text end 3 deleted text begin and 3adeleted text end $17.25 Enhanced deleted text begin Minnesotadeleted text end identification card deleted text begin $32.25 deleted text end new text begin $64.50 new text end (b) In addition to each fee required in paragraph (a), the commissioner must collect a surcharge of deleted text begin $2.25deleted text end new text begin $4.50new text end . Surcharges collected under this paragraph must be credited to the driver and vehicle services technology account under section 299A.705. (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), an individual who holds a provisional license and has a driving record free of (1) convictions for a violation of section 169A.20, 169A.33, 169A.35, sections 169A.50 to 169A.53, or section 171.177, (2) convictions for crash-related moving violations, and (3) convictions for moving violations that are not crash related, has a $3.50 credit toward the fee for any classified under-21 driver's license. "Moving violation" has the meaning given it in section 171.04, subdivision 1. (d) In addition to the driver's license fee required under paragraph (a), the commissioner must collect an additional deleted text begin $4deleted text end new text begin $8new text end processing fee from each new applicant or individual renewing a license with a school bus endorsement to cover the costs for processing an applicant's initial and biennial physical examination certificate. The department must not charge these applicants any other fee to receive or renew the endorsement. (e) In addition to the fee required under paragraph (a), a driver's license agent may charge and retain a filing fee as provided under section 171.061, subdivision 4. (f) In addition to the fee required under paragraph (a), the commissioner must charge a filing fee at the same amount as a driver's license agent under section 171.061, subdivision 4. Revenue collected under this paragraph must be deposited in the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705. (g) An application for a Minnesota identification card, instruction permit, provisional license, or driver's license, including an application for renewal, must contain a provision that allows the applicant to add to the fee under paragraph (a), a deleted text begin $2deleted text end new text begin $4new text end donation for the purposes of public information and education on anatomical gifts under section 171.075. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to new or renewal applications for drivers' licenses or identification cards submitted on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.06, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Motorcycle endorsement fee. (a) In addition to the appropriate fee under subdivision 2, the fee for a motorcycle endorsement on a driver's license is: (1) deleted text begin $26.50deleted text end new text begin $43.50new text end for an initial endorsement or a duplicate license obtained for the purpose of adding the endorsement; and (2) deleted text begin $17deleted text end new text begin $34new text end for each license renewal with the endorsement. (b) The additional fee must be paid into the state treasury and credited as follows: (1) deleted text begin $19deleted text end new text begin $31.25new text end of the additional fee under paragraph (a), clause (1), and deleted text begin $11deleted text end new text begin $22new text end of the additional fee under paragraph (a), clause (2), to the motorcycle safety account, which is hereby created in the special revenue fund; and (2) the remainder to the general fund. (c) All application forms prepared by the commissioner for motorcycle endorsements must clearly state the amount of the total fee that is dedicated to the motorcycle safety account. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to new or renewal applications for drivers' licenses or identification cards submitted on or after that date. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.061, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Fee; equipment. (a) The agent may charge and retain a filing fee for each application as follows: (1) New application for a noncompliant, REAL ID-compliant, or enhanced driver's license or identification card $ deleted text begin 16.00 deleted text end new text begin 27.00 new text end (2) Renewal application for a noncompliant, REAL ID-compliant, or enhanced driver's license or identification card $ deleted text begin 11.00 deleted text end new text begin 22.00 new text end Except as provided in paragraph (c), the fee must cover all expenses involved in receiving, accepting, or forwarding to the department the applications and fees required under sections 171.02, subdivision 3; 171.06, subdivisions 2 and 2a; and 171.07, subdivisions 3 and 3a. (b) The statutory fees and the filing fees imposed under paragraph (a) may be paid by credit card or debit card. The driver's license agent may collect a convenience fee on the statutory fees and filing fees not greater than the cost of processing a credit card or debit card transaction. The convenience fee must be used to pay the cost of processing credit card and debit card transactions. The commissioner must adopt rules to administer this paragraph using the exempt procedures of section 14.386, except that section 14.386, paragraph (b), does not apply. (c) The department must maintain the photo identification and vision examination equipment for all agents. All photo identification and vision examination equipment must be compatible with standards established by the department. (d) A filing fee retained by the agent employed by a county board must be paid into the county treasury and credited to the general revenue fund of the county. An agent who is not an employee of the county must retain the filing fee in lieu of county employment or salary and is considered an independent contractor for pension purposes, coverage under the Minnesota State Retirement System, or membership in the Public Employees Retirement Association. (e) Before the end of the first working day following the final day of the reporting period established by the department, the agent must forward to the department all applications and fees collected during the reporting period except as provided in paragraph (d). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to new or renewal applications for drivers' licenses or identification cards submitted on or after that date. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.07, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Identification card expiration. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the expiration date of a Minnesota identification card is the birthday of the applicant in the deleted text begin fourthdeleted text end new text begin eighthnew text end year following the date of issuance of the card. deleted text begin (b)deleted text end For an applicant age 65 or olderdeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1) the expiration date of a Minnesota identification card is the birthday of the applicant in the eighth year following the date of issuance of the card; or deleted text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end a noncompliant identification card is valid for the lifetime of the applicant. deleted text begin (c) For the purposes of paragraph (b), "Minnesota identification card" does not include an enhanced identification card issued to an applicant age 65 or older. deleted text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end The expiration date for an Under-21 identification card is the cardholder's 21st birthday. The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end issue an identification card to a holder of an Under-21 identification card who applies for the card, pays the required fee, and presents proof of identity and age, unless the commissioner determines that the applicant is not qualified for the identification card. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) deleted text begin to (d)deleted text end new text begin and (b)new text end , the expiration date for an identification card issued to a person with temporary lawful status is the last day of the person's legal stay in the United States, or one year after issuance if the last day of the person's legal stay is not identified. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to new or renewal applications for drivers' licenses or identification cards submitted on or after that date. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.071, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Variance for homebound individuals. (a) Notwithstanding section 171.07 or Minnesota Rules, part 7410.1810, the commissioner may grant a variance from the photograph requirements for a noncompliant identification card if: (1) the individual is homebound as defined in paragraph (b); (2) the individual has submitted proof of homebound status; and (3) the department has a photograph of the applicant on file that was taken within the last deleted text begin fourdeleted text end new text begin eightnew text end years or during the most recent renewal cycle or the applicant has submitted a photograph to the department that meets the requirements of section 171.07, Minnesota Rules, part 7410.1810, subpart 1, and other technical requirements established by the commissioner, such as background color and electronic file size, to ensure the image can be used on a credential and conforms with images taken by the department. Applicants granted a photograph variance under this subdivision are not required to appear in person to have a new photograph taken. (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "homebound" means the individual is unable to leave the individual's residence due to a medical, physical, or mental health condition or infirmity as documented in writing by a physician, case worker, or social worker. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to new or renewal applications for drivers' licenses or identification cards submitted on or after that date. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.27, is amended to read: 171.27 LICENSE EXPIRATION AND RENEWAL; EXCEPTIONS. Subdivision 1. Expiration. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the expiration date for each driver's license is the birthday of the driver in the deleted text begin fourthdeleted text end new text begin eighthnew text end year following the date of issuance of the license. The birthday of the driver deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be as indicated on the application for a driver's license. A license may be renewed on or before expiration or within one year after expiration upon application, payment of the required fee, and passing the examination required of all drivers for renewal. Driving privileges deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be extended or renewed on or preceding the expiration date of an existing driver's license unless the commissioner believes that the licensee is no longer qualified as a driver. (b) The expiration date for each under-21 license deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be the 21st birthday of the licensee. Upon the licensee attaining the age of 21 and upon the application, payment of the required fee, and passing the examination required of all drivers for renewal, a driver's license deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be issued unless the commissioner determines that the licensee is no longer qualified as a driver. (c) The expiration date for each provisional license is two years after the date of application for the provisional license. (d) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) to (c), the expiration date for a license issued to a person with temporary lawful status is the last day of the person's legal stay in the United States, or one year after issuance if the last day of the person's legal stay is not identified. Subd. 2. Extension of expiration. (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "eligible individual" means: (1) a person then or subsequently serving outside Minnesota in active military service, as defined in section 190.05, subdivision 5, in any branch or unit of the armed forces of the United States; (2) a person then or subsequently serving outside Minnesota as a volunteer in the Peace Corps; (3) a person who is an employee of a federal department or agency and is assigned to foreign service outside of the United States; or (4) a person residing outside of Minnesota because the person is a spouse, domestic partner, or dependent under age 26 of a person in clause (1), (2), or (3). (b) A valid Minnesota driver's license issued to an eligible individual continues in full force and effect without requirement for renewal until the date one year following the person's separation or discharge from active military or volunteer service, or following the conclusion of assignment to foreign service outside the United States, and until the license holder's birthday in the deleted text begin fourthdeleted text end new text begin eighthnew text end full year following the person's most recent license renewal or, in the case of a provisional license, until the person's birthday in the third full year following the renewal. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to new or renewal applications for drivers' licenses or identification cards submitted on or after that date. new text end